Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Bingo Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 9-204 to 9-225.02 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-125;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 2.